DI-252 DIAGNOSTICS - ACTIVEHEIGHT CONTROL SUSPENSION &
SKYHOOK TEMS

DI3GO-05

DTC C 1751/ 51 AHC Pump & Motor Circuit

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION

In case that the height control has not consisted in spite of performing the raise control for a certain period
of time, the ECU interrupts the height control.

DTC No. DTC Detecting Condition Trouble Area
* AHC pump &motor
When therise control completion condition has not consisted ¢ AHC pump & motor circuit
inspite ofturning on electricity to the relay for the following * AHC motorrelay
C1751/ 51 period oftime: * Height control sensor link comes off
LO — N:85seconds « Fluid leakage from the fluid line or each solenoid valve
N — HI: 100seconds ¢ Fluid clogin the fluidline or each solenoid valve
* Torsion barspring

Fail safe function:

If trouble occurs, the height control is prohibited after adjusting the vehicle to the standard height in case
that the height is higher than the standard or to the lowest wheel of the 4 wheels in case that the height is
lower than the standard.

LAND CRUISER (W/G) (RM6 16E)



DIAGNOSTICS - ACTIVEHEIGHT CONTROL SUSPENSION & DI-253
SKYHOOK TEMS
WIRING DIAGRAM
LHD
. 2
Engine Room J/B * G-Y Suspension Control ECU
AHC Motor Relay
6 oy 1 *1G.-Y J15J/C *1(3. v 5 ( \
iz »(D i3} g (89) RC
Cowl Side J/B RH
7 Pump &Motor 19
L-B W-B
1 Rl )® 2@1 @(
3G9 °
RO 10
AHC
B FL Block
L attel'y ALT T
:7 f—l|——4| 5
= = = ~—
RHD
Engine R B
ngine Room J/ Suspension Control ECU
AHC Motor Relay R
o Gy e G-Y f“,S
4 gl 3 )® I—IIG3 89 RC
Engine Room J/B
7] o woa 2] ws
ooz ®(D——1M——1C 1E
AHC 1 B
o0 )@
Batt FL Block
attery
EE | ALT EB
Jj_”"-ll o5
= = = —
]
*2: 2UZ -FEEngine
* :1HD-FTEand 1HD-T Engine F05855

LAND CRUISER (W/G) (RM6 16E)
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INSPECTION PROCEDURE

1 Check fluid level of the reservoir tank (See page SA-303).

AHC.

NG> Fill the reservoir tank with suspension fluid

@

2 [ Check fluid leakage (See page SA-305).

@

3 | Check that the height control sensor link has not come off.

NG> Repair or replace the part with fluid leakage.

NO> Repair or replace height control sensor link.

YES

4 | Check fluid delivery pressure of the AHC pump & motor.

Check that the fluid pressure raises by raising the vehicle height with the height select switch with the same
procedure as the torsion bar spring adjustment (See page SA-313).

NG> Replace AHC pump & motor.
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5 | Check AHC motor relay.

PREPARATION:
Remove the AHC motor relay from Engine Room J/B.

@——1) CHECK:
Check continuity between each pair of terminal of motor relay.

OK:

Continuity

Terminals 3 and 4
(Referencevalue62 Q)

Terminals 1 and2 Open

CHECK:

(@) Apply battery voltage between terminals 3 and 4.
(b) Check continuity betweenterminals 1 and 2.

OK:

Terminals 1 and2 | Continuity

BE 1840

Ri5258 NG% place AHC motorrelay.

F00044
OK\

6 | Check for open and short circuit in harness and connector between AHC pump
& motor and suspension control ECU, AHC motor relay and battery (See page
IN-35).

NG> Repair or replace harness or connector.

@

Clear the DTC (See page DI-208).
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